dictsource/nl_rules
.group t
             t            t
             td           t
          t) t
             tie (_       =tsi
          c) tie (_       =si
          k) tie (_       =si
          p) tie (_       =si
          s) tie (_       =ti
        cra) tie (_       ts'i
             tiee (l_     S'e:
             tië (le_     S'e:
          @) ti (a        S
          @) ti (eus      S
          @) ti (euz      S
          @) ti (ë        S
          @) ti (on       S
          s) t (i++       t
             tj           t;
             tsj          tS
          _) th           t
             th           t
             t (haar      t        // th is not [t]
             t (hav       t
          _) toe (@P3     t'u

          _) team         t'i:m
             team (_      ti:m
             touch (e     tuS
          _) train        tre:n
          _) trans (@P5   tr,Ans

.group te
          _) tege (lijk   t@Q@
          _) tegen (P5    t'e:Q@n
          _) terug (P5    t@r'8x
          _) te (gelijkP2   t@
          _) te (gemoetP2 t@
          _) te (goed     t@
          _) te (hui      t@        // tehuis
          _) te (keer     t@
          _) te (kort     t@
          _) te (leur     t@
          _) te (loor     t@
          _) te (meer     t@
          _) te (midd     t@        // temidden
          _) te (na       t@
          _) te (neer     t@
          _) te (recht    t@
          _) te (sam      t@        // tesamen
          _) te (veel     t@
          _) te (vergeefP2  t@
          _) te (werk     t@
          _) te (voorschijn t@
          _) te (vor      t@        // tevoren
          _) te (vred     t@        // tevreden
          _) teweeg (P6   t@v#'e:x


.group u
             u            y
             u (CK        8
             u (x         8
             uu           y
             ui           Wy
             uw (A        yw
             uw (K        yU

          _) uit (@P3      'Wyt
             uul (_       'yl  // from -ule
             us (_        8s
             u (sie_      'y
          @) ute (_       'yt
             uu (r_       'y


.group v
             v            v
          s) v            f

          _) vakantie (@P8 va:k'Antsi
          _) van (@P3     v%An
          _) vanzelf (@P7 vAnz,Elf
          _) vang         vAN
          _) ver (@P3     v@r
          _) ver (enK     vI:r  // veren(d)(de)
          _) ver (sie_    vEr
          _) verder       vErd@r
          _) verkeers (@P8 v@rk'I:rs
          _) voor         v'O:r
          _) voorjaars (@P9 v'O:rja:rs
          _) voort (@P5   v'O:rt
          _) vrijwilligers (@P13 vrEIv#'Il@Q@rs


.group w
             w            v#
             w (X         w
             w (CK        w

          _) wan (@P3     v#'An
          _) wan (L01@P3  v#'AN
          _) wan (del     v#An
          _) wanhopig     v#Anh'o:p@Q
          _) wan (kel     v#AN
          _) wann (eer    v#An
          _) wanordelijk  v#An_|'Ord@l@k
          _) wansmakelijk v#Ansm'a:k@l@k
          _) wanstaltig   v#Anst'Alt@Q
          _) wantrouwig   v#Antr'VU@Q
          _) wanvoeglijk  v#Anv'uxl@k
          _) water (@P5   v#'a:t@r
          _) weers (@P5   v#'I:rs
          _) weg (@P3     v#'EQ
          _) weg (en      v#e:Q
          _) weg (e_      v#e:Q  // bewegelijk
          _) weg (ing     v#e:Q  // bewegingen
          _) wereld (@P6  v#'I:r@lt
          _) werk (@P4    v#'Erk
          _) werk (el     v#'Erk
          _) werk (ing    v#'Erk
          _) west (@P4    v#Est
          _) wets (@P4    v#'Ets
          _) winter (@P6  v#'Int@r
          _) woon (@P4    v#'o:n
          _) wr (@        vr


.group x
             x            ks


.group y
             y            i
             y (CK        I
             y (x         I
          _) y (A         j


.group z
             z            z
             z (z
          s) z

          _) zee (@P3     z'e:
          _) zeeuw        zeU
             zele (_S4   ze:l@ // common suffix for cities.
          @) zelf (_S4   s'Elf
          _) zoge (@P4    z,o:Q@
          _) zomer (@P5   z'o:m@r
          _) zuid (@P4    zWyt


.group
            é             e:
            é (_         'e:
           éé            e:
            ère (_        'Er@
            $             d'OlAr
            , (D          k'Oma:
        __) - (_D         m'In
         @) 's (_S2       s

      erie) ën (_S2       @n
 
